District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.73

Notes redeemable prior to maturity.

No notes issued pursuant to this part shall be made payable on demand, but any note may be made subject to redemption prior to maturity on such notice and at such time as may be stated in the note.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 806, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 473

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-329.
1973 Ed., § 47-249.

References in Text

“This part,” referred to in this section, refers to part E (comprising of §§ 461 to 490) of title IV of the District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, approved December 24, 1973, 88 Stat. 804-809, Pub. L. 93-198, codified as §§ 1-204.89, 1-204.88, 1-204.87, and 1-204.61 to 1-204.90.

Editor's Notes

Enactment upon adoption of federal legislation: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-254 provided that “§§ 47-101, 47-117, 47-130, 47-301, 47-302, 47-303, 47-304, 47-304.1, 47-305, 47-310, 47-312, 47-317.1 through 47-317.6, 47-321 through 47-325, 47-327 through 47-331, and 47-332 through 47-334 of Title 47 §§ 1-204.41, 1-204.55, 1-204.50, 1-204.42, 1-204.43, 1-204.44, 1-204.46, 1-204.53, 1-204.47, 1-204.48, 1-204.49, 1-204.24a through 1-204.24e, 47-317.06, 1-204.61 through 1-204.65, 1-204.71 through 1-204.75, 1-204.81, 1-204.85, 1-204.86 and 1-204.90, 2001 Ed. of the District of Columbia Code shall be enacted as part of Title 47 upon the adoption by Congress of legislation so enacting these sections.”